tests/possessives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../kjh.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../kjh.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Noun ат ":
    ат<n><px1sg><nom> : адым
    ат<n><px2sg><nom> : адың
    ат<n><px3sp><nom> : ады
    ат<n><px1pl><nom> : адыбыс
    ат<n><px2pl><nom> : адыңар
